Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Administrative Dissolution

48-245-301. Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under § 48-245-302 to administratively dissolve the LLC if:

The LLC does not deliver its properly completed annual report to the secretary of state within two (2) months after it is due;

The LLC is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for two (2) months or more;

The name of an LLC contained in a document filed pursuant to chapters 201-248 of this title fails to comply with § 48-207-101;

The LLC does not notify the secretary of state within two (2) months that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued;

The LLC submits to the secretary of state's office a check, bank draft, money order or other such instrument, for payment of any fee and it is dishonored upon presentation for payment;

A governor, manager, member or other representative of an LLC signed a document such person knew was false in any material respect with the intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing; or

A period is fixed in the articles of organization for the duration of the LLC, upon the expiration of that period, but if no such period is set forth in the articles, then the LLC shall have a perpetual existence.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 81; 2016, ch. 688, § 6.

48-245-302. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under § 48-245-301 for dissolving an LLC, the secretary of state shall serve the LLC with written communication of the secretary of state's determination in accordance with §§ 48-208-104 and 48-208-105, except that such determination may be sent by first class mail.

If the LLC does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within two (2) months after service of the communication in accordance with §§ 48-208-104 and 48-208-105, the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the LLC by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the LLC in accordance with §§ 48-208-104 and 48-208-105, except that the certificate may be sent by first class mail.

An LLC administratively dissolved continues its existence but may not carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under § 48-245-501 and notify claimants under § 48-245-502.

The administrative dissolution of an LLC does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-245-303. Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

An LLC administratively dissolved under § 48-245-302 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement following administrative dissolution. The application must:

Be accompanied by a confirmation of good standing relative to such LLC;

Recite the name of the LLC at its date of administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

State an LLC name that satisfies the requirements of § 48-207-101;

If the secretary of state determines that the application is accompanied by the confirmation of good standing and contains the information required by subsection (a), and that such information is correct, then the secretary of state shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the LLC in accordance with § 48-208-104.

If the LLC name in subdivision (a)(4) is different than the LLC name in subdivision (a)(2), the application for reinstatement shall constitute an amendment to the articles insofar as it pertains to the LLC's name.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the LLC resumes carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, §§ 27, 28; 2011, ch. 99, §§ 5-7.

48-245-304. Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the secretary of state denies an LLC's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the secretary of state shall serve the LLC in accordance with §§ 48-208-104 and 48-208-105 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The LLC may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the chancery court of Davidson County within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial. The LLC appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state's certificate of dissolution, the LLC's application for reinstatement, and the secretary of state's notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the dissolved LLC or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-245-305. Articles of termination following administrative dissolution.

When an LLC, which has been administratively dissolved, wishes to terminate its existence, it may do so without first being reinstated by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of termination following administrative dissolution setting forth:

The name of the LLC;

The date that termination of LLC existence was authorized;

That the resolution authorizing termination was duly adopted by the members;

A copy of the resolution or the written consent authorizing the termination; and

That all the assets of the LLC have been distributed to its creditors and members.

The secretary of state shall file the articles of termination following administrative dissolution if the secretary of state finds that the articles:

Comply with subsection (a); and

Are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such LLC.

Upon such filing, the existence of the LLC shall cease, except that the termination of LLC existence shall not take away or impair any remedy to or against the LLC or its members, governors, or managers for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the LLC may be prosecuted or defended by the LLC in its LLC name. The members, governors, or managers shall have the power to take such LLC or other action as may be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 29.

48-245-306. Reinstatement within certain amount of time — Amendment of articles of organization— Application for reinstatement.

A LLC that has been administratively dissolved by the expiration of its period of duration may reinstate within one (1) year of the expiration of the period of duration by:

Amending its articles of organization to extend its period of duration or set the period of duration to perpetual; and

Filing an application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution pursuant to § 48-245-303.

Acts 2016, ch. 688, § 7.